District of Columbia statutes.
16-3543

Proceedings on default.

If the defendant does not appear as required by a writ of quo warranto, after being served, the court may proceed to hear proof in support of the writ and render judgment accordingly.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 603, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 563, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(n)
1973 Ed., § 16-3543.
1981 Ed., § 16-3543.